Tennessee, session 114, HB0066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(f)(1)(D), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(D) Residential information, including the street address, city, state, and zip
code, for any state, county, municipal, or other public employee;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0066
001159
- 1 -